src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.aff
SFX X 0 маётганларингизнинг-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизга [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгами [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизга-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгадир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизга-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизданми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздандир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздан-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздандир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздан-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизда [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздами [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздадир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизда-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздадир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингиздамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларингизда-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганлари [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларими [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганлари-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганлари-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларини [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганлариними [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинидир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларини-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинидир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларини-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларининг [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларининг-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингдир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларинингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларининг-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларига [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларигами [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларигадир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларига-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларигадир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларигамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларига-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганлариданми [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидандир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидан-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидандир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганлариданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидан-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларида [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидами [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидадир [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларида-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидадир-да [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларидамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 маётганларида-ку [аеёиоуўэюя]
SFX X 0 аётган [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётган-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётган-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганнинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганга [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгангами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгангадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганга-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгангадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгангамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганда [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганда-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётгандамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганим [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганим-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганиммикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганим-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимнинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимга [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимгами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимгадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимга-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимда [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимда-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимдамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиз [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиз-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиз-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизнинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизга [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизгами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизга-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизгадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизга-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизданми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздан-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздандир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздан-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизда [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздами [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизда-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздадир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганимизда-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганинг-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингни [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингними [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнидир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингни-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнидир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингни-ку [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнинг [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнингми [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнинг-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
SFX X 0 аётганингнингдир-да [^аеёиоуўэюяй]
