src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
авайла/X
автоматлаш/X
адабсизлан/X
ажабсинқира/X
азизлан/X
айғоқла/X
айлан/X
айрил/X
айҳайлаш/X
активлаш/X
аланг-жаланглан/X
алебастрла/X
аллала/X
амалийлаштир/X
англашил/X
анқайиш/X
аралаш/X
арзонлаш/X
аррала/X
арчиш/X
асослантирил/X
асфальтлаш/X
афшонла/X
ачинтир/X
бабала/X
бадбурушлан/X
бажарол/X
бақувватлан/X
банкротлаш/X
барқира/X
батраклаштир/X
баҳузурлан/X
бежал/X
безаттир/X
безрайтир/X
белантир/X
беморлан/X
беркитил/X
бетинчлаш/X
беҳбеҳла/X
биғирлат/X
биқ/X
билвор/X
билқи/X
биркит/X
битказил/X
бобилла/X
бозиллат/X
боқтиргиз/X
бонғилла/X
босавер/X
ботирлан/X
бошқирдчала/X
брусчаткала/X
буғлантир/X
бўжрай/X
бузоқла/X
бук/X
букрайтир/X
булаттир/X
бўлиниш/X
буралтир/X
бўриқ/X
бўрлан/X
бўрттир/X
бўтқалан/X
бўшалтир/X
буюрил/X
вавақла/X
важирлат/X
вақирлаш/X
варақлат/X
ваҳимасира/X
вижилла/X
витаминлаштир/X
войдодлат/X
гавжумлаш/X
галдира/X
ганчламоқ-ганчлан/X
гаранглан/X
гердайиш/X
гизгизлат/X
гримла/X
гувран/X
гуллат/X
гупгупла/X
гурпанглаш/X
ғағала/X
ғалаёнлан/X
ғарчилла/X
ғизилла/X
ғилофлан/X
ғинғиллаш/X
ғичирлат/X
ғўддай/X
ғўлдират/X
давлатлаштир/X
дадиллаш/X
даққилан/X
данғилла/X
дардсин/X
дастурлан/X
дезинфекцияла/X
депаралаштир/X
диетология/X
дилгирлан/X
динғирла/X
дихотомлан/X
доимийлаштир/X
дувулла/X
дукулла/X
думала/X
дўпилла/X
дўрайтир/X
е/X
егиздир/X
ёғочлан/X
ёзавер/X
ёйдиргиз/X
ёқил/X
ёлғизлан/X
ёлқинлантир/X
ёлчит/X
ёнаш/X
ёндамала/X
ёпир/X
ёрит/X
ёруғлантир/X
етишиш/X
ётоқла/X
ечинтириш/X
жабдуқлат/X
жағирлаш/X
жамалакла/X
жарақла/X
жерк/X
жийиртир/X
жилдиртир/X
жим/X
жингирлат/X
жирракилаш/X
жойлаштирил/X
жувурлат/X
жўнаттирил/X
жуфтлаштир/X
замазкала/X
захала/X
зинғирлат/X
зорилла/X
ивитиш/X
изоҳла/X
илгарилат/X
илкилла/X
ингичкалаштирил/X
инқилла/X
ирвай/X
исиниш/X
истироҳатлан/X
ичик/X
ишлайвер/X
йиғдир/X
йириклаштир/X
йўқотиш/X
йўн/X
йўрттир/X
калтакла/X
карилла/X
квотала/X
кемиравер/X
кескинлаш/X
кечкир/X
киргиздир/X
кичрайт/X
кодла/X
конкретлаштирил/X
кристаллан/X
куймалан/X
кўлла/X
кўниктир/X
кураттир/X
кўтаргиз/X
кучсизлантир/X
қадаттир/X
қайиш/X
қақала/X
қалтира/X
қантариш/X
қаршилаш/X
қатъийлаштир/X
қизғантир/X
қиймалан/X
қиличлаш/X
қирилиш/X
қисқартирил/X
қиялан/X
қоқлат/X
қонунийлаштир/X
қоронғилаш/X
қувла/X
қуйдиртир/X
қўлланил/X
қўн/X
қўриқлаш/X
қуруқса/X
қучиш/X
лаққилан/X
лимиллат/X
локалла/X
мағрурлан/X
майинлаш/X
мароқлантир/X
маъқуллат/X
меъёрла/X
миллийлаш/X
мириқиш/X
молалан/X
мувофиқлаш/X
мукофотлантир/X
мунғай/X
муҳокамалаш/X
нақдлан/X
нафратла/X
ниқобла/X
нозлан/X
ноталаштир/X
нўхталан/X
овуниш/X
одатланил/X
ойдинлат/X
олай/X
оловлат/X
оралан/X
ос/X
оҳаклат/X
ошатиш/X
пақилла/X
парлат/X
патентлаштирил/X
пийпа/X
пирпира/X
пиши/X
пойлатил/X
пошналат/X
пўрсилла/X
радиолаштир/X
расмийлаштирил/X
ривожлантир/X
савағичла/X
сакраш/X
санкциялан/X
сарил/X
севала/X
семиртирил/X
сескан/X
сийир/X
сиқинқира/X
силлиқлаштир/X
синфсизлаш/X
сирма/X
совурил/X
соқовлан/X
сохталаштирил/X
суғор/X
сўзлат/X
сўқиш/X
сундир/X
сўрдир/X
суртиш/X
суяклан/X
тажассумлан/X
такрорлат/X
тақирлат/X
тамалан/X
таништир/X
тарангла/X
тармаш/X
таснифла/X
таҳқирла/X
таъзимла/X
тебраттир/X
тезоблан/X
теп/X
терла/X
тижорийлаштир/X
тикирлат/X
тила/X
тимтала/X
тинчсизлан/X
тирилла/X
тиртай/X
тишлан/X
тойил/X
томчилантир/X
тормозла/X
туга/X
тўғрамчила/X
тўздиртир/X
тўйинтирил/X
тўқмоқлаш/X
тўлиш/X
тундлаш/X
тупурикла/X
тўрсайиш/X
туташтирил/X
тўшаттир/X
увоқла/X
ўз/X
узил/X
уйдирил/X
ўйнаб-кул/X
ўқалоқла/X
улаштир/X
ўлчанил/X
ўнг/X
унут/X
ўрганил/X
ўрла/X
урчитил/X
ўтказдир/X
ўтроқлаштир/X
ўчирил/X
ўшқир/X
фаоллаштир/X
фосфорла/X
харобалан/X
хижиллан/X
хитойчала/X
хослан/X
хўраклантир/X
ҳавойилан/X
ҳайтла/X
ҳансира/X
ҳидлаттир/X
ҳовлиқтир/X
ҳузурлан/X
ҳушёрлан/X
чайирлаш/X
чақир/X
чалинтир/X
чанглантир/X
чармлаттир/X
чек/X
четлаштирил/X
чизиллаш/X
чиқил/X
чиниқтир/X
чирпин/X
чопиштир/X
чувиш/X
чўзиш/X
чуқурла/X
чўнқай/X
чучула/X
шакллантирил/X
шанғилла/X
шарҳлат/X
шиғирла/X
шилталан/X
ширавақай/X
шовдира/X
шошилиш/X
шўмғит/X
эгилиш/X
эктиртир/X
эмиздир/X
эринтир/X
эсонлаш/X
ювиш/X
юқорилан/X
юмшар/X
ютил/X
якунлан/X
яллиғлат/X
янглиш/X
ярқиллат/X
яхлитлаштирил/X
